Utah statutes.
78B-13-111.   Taking testimony in another state.
(1)  In addition to other procedures available to a party, a party to a child
custody proceeding may offer testimony of witnesses who are located in another
state, including testimony of the parties and the child, by deposition or
other means allowable in this state for testimony taken in another state.  The
court on its own motion may order that the testimony of a person be taken in
another state and may prescribe the manner in which and the terms upon which
the testimony is taken.
(2)  A court of this state may permit an individual residing in another state
to be deposed or to testify by telephone, audiovisual means, or other
electronic means before a designated court or at another location in that
state.  A court of this state shall cooperate with courts of other states in
designating an appropriate location for the deposition or testimony.
(3)  Documentary evidence transmitted from another state to a court of this
state by technological means that do not produce an original writing may not
be excluded from evidence on an objection based on the means of transmission.
